Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4080.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric utility” means a public utility, a people’s utility district operating under ORS
chapter 261, a municipal utility operating under ORS chapter 225 or an electric cooperative
organized under ORS chapter 62.
(b) “Portable solar photovoltaic energy device” and “device” mean a device that:
(A) Is moveable;
(B) Has a primary purpose of collecting solar energy and generating electricity by
photovoltaic effect;
(C) Has a maximum generating capacity of 1,200 watts or less;
(D) Is designed to be connected to a building’s electrical system through a standard
120-volt alternating current electrical outlet and receptacle;
(E) Includes a safety feature or operates with an ancillary device that prevents the
portable solar photovoltaic energy device from energizing the building’s electrical system
during a power outage; and
(F) Is listed by Underwriters Laboratories or any other nationally recognized testing
laboratory or an equivalent organization.
(c) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(2) Subject to requirements under this section and the state building code, a retail elec-
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 75

HB 4080
tricity consumer may install and use one or more portable solar photovoltaic energy devices
with up to a total maximum generating capacity of 1,200 watts for the primary purpose of
offsetting part or all of the retail electricity consumer’s requirements for electricity.
(3) Prior to installing a portable solar photovoltaic energy device, a retail electricity
consumer shall file a declaration with the electric utility in whose service territory the
portable solar photovoltaic energy device will be installed. The declaration must specify:
(a) The number of devices the retail electricity consumer intends to install; and
(b) For each device the retail electricity consumer intends to install:
(A) The device’s maximum generating capacity in watts; and
(B) The location where the device will be installed.
(4)(a) The installation or use of a portable solar photovoltaic energy device by a retail
electricity consumer does not require an electric utility’s review or approval nor require an
interconnection agreement.
(b) An electric utility may not charge a retail electricity consumer:
(A) A fee for the filing of a declaration described under subsection (3) of this section; or
(B) A fee or charge that would increase the retail electricity consumer’s minimum
monthly charge to an amount greater than that of other retail electricity consumers in the
same rate class as the retail electricity consumer.
(5) An electric utility is not liable for any loss or injury, including death, that is caused
by or arising from a retail electricity consumer’s portable solar photovoltaic energy device,
or for the acts or omissions of the retail electricity consumer that cause loss or injury, in-
cluding death, to any third party.
(6) Subject to the requirements of ORS 757.300, a portable solar photovoltaic energy de-
vice may be used as a net metering facility under ORS 757.300.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “portable solar photovoltaic energy device” and
“device” have the meaning given those terms in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(2) A landlord may not prohibit or restrict a tenant from installing or using a portable
solar photovoltaic energy device of the tenant’s choosing, unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law;
(B) Violate the device manufacturer’s written safety guidelines for the device;
(C) Damage the premises or render the premises uninhabitable; or
(D) Require an electrical capacity or amperage that cannot be accommodated by the
electrical service of the building, dwelling unit or circuit; or
(b) If the device would be installed in an exterior area:
(A) The exterior area is a required egress;
(B) The device would interfere with the tenant’s ability to secure a door or window that
is accessible from outside;
(C) Installation of the device requires the use of brackets or other hardware that would
damage or void the warranty of the door or window or frame, puncture the envelope of the
building or otherwise cause significant damages; or
(D) The restrictions require that the device be installed in a manner that prevents risk
of falling.
(3) A landlord may not enforce a restriction on portable solar photovoltaic energy devices
[2]

HB 4080
against a tenant allowed under subsection (2) of this section unless the restrictions are in
writing and delivered to the tenant.
(4) A landlord is immune from liability for any claim for damages, injury or death caused
by a portable solar photovoltaic energy device installed by the tenant.
SECTION 5. ORS 94.779 is amended to read:
94.779. (1) A provision of a planned community’s governing document or landscaping or archi-
tectural guidelines that imposes irrigation requirements on an owner or the association is void and
unenforceable while any of the following is in effect:
(a) A declaration by the Governor that a severe, continuing drought exists or is likely to occur
in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(b) A finding by the Water Resources Commission that a severe, continuing drought exists or is
likely to occur in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(c) An ordinance adopted by the governing body of a political subdivision within which the
planned community is located that requires conservation or curtailment of water use; or
(d) A rule adopted by the association under subsection (2) of this section to reduce or eliminate
irrigation water use.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of a planned community’s governing documents or landscaping
or architectural guidelines imposing irrigation requirements on an owner or the association, an as-
sociation may adopt rules that:
(a) Require the reduction or elimination of irrigation on any portion of the planned community.
(b) Permit or require the replacement of turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape on
any portion of the planned community.
(c) Require prior review and approval by the association or its designee of any plans by an
owner or the association to replace turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape.
(d) Require the use of best practices and industry standards to reduce the landscaped areas and
minimize irrigation of existing landscaped areas of common property where turf is necessary for the
function of the landscaped area.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, if adopted on or after January
1, 2018, the following provisions of a planned community’s governing document are void and
unenforceable:
(a) A provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or lot as the premises of
an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500; or
(b) If the unit does not share a wall, floor or ceiling surface in common with another unit, a
provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or lot as a certified or registered
family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not prohibit a homeowners association from adopting or
enforcing a provision of the planned community’s governing document that regulates parking, noise,
odors, nuisance, use of common property or activities that impact the cost of insurance policies held
by the planned community, provided the provision:
(a) Is reasonable; and
(b) Does not have the effect of prohibiting or restricting the use of a unit or lot as the premises
of an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500
or as a certified or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(5)(a) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to planned communities that provide housing
for older persons.
[3]

HB 4080
(b) As used in this subsection, “housing for older persons” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 659A.421.
(6) A provision in a planned community’s governing document that restricts or prohibits the in-
stallation or use of a portable cooling device, as defined in ORS 90.355, is void and unenforceable,
unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law; or
(B) Violate the device manufacturer’s written safety guidelines for the device; or
(b) The restrictions are only to require that the device be removed from October 1 through April
30.
(7) A provision in a planned community’s governing document that restricts or prohibits
the installation or use of a portable solar photovoltaic energy device, as defined in section 2
of this 2026 Act, is void and unenforceable, unless the installation or use of the device would:
(a) Violate building codes or state or federal law; or
(b) Violate the device manufacturer’s written safety guidelines for the device.
SECTION 6. ORS 100.023 is amended to read:
100.023. (1) A provision of a condominium’s governing document or landscaping or architectural
guidelines that imposes irrigation requirements on a unit owner or the association is void and
unenforceable while any of the following is in effect:
(a) A declaration by the Governor that a severe, continuing drought exists or is likely to occur
in a political subdivision within which the condominium is located;
(b) A finding by the Water Resources Commission that a severe, continuing drought exists or is
likely to occur in a political subdivision within which the condominium is located;
(c) An ordinance adopted by the governing body of a political subdivision within which the
condominium is located that requires conservation or curtailment of water use; or
(d) A rule adopted by the association under subsection (2) of this section to reduce or eliminate
irrigation water use.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of a condominium’s governing document or landscaping or
architectural guidelines imposing irrigation requirements on a unit owner or the association, an
association may adopt rules that:
(a) Require the reduction or elimination of irrigation on any portion of the condominium.
(b) Permit or require the replacement of turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape on
any portion of the condominium.
(c) Require prior review and approval by the association or its designee of any plans by a unit
owner or the association to replace turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape.
(d) Require the use of best practices and industry standards to reduce the landscaped areas and
minimize irrigation of existing landscaped general common elements where turf is necessary for the
function of the general common elements.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, if adopted after January 1, 2018,
the following provisions of a condominium’s governing document are void and unenforceable:
(a) A provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the unit owner’s condominium unit or any
limited common element designated for exclusive use by the occupants of the unit as the premises
of an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500;
or
(b) If the condominium unit does not share a wall, floor or ceiling surface in common with an-
[4]

HB 4080
other unit, a provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the unit owner’s condominium unit or
any limited common element designated for exclusive use by the occupants of the unit as a certified
or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not prohibit an association of unit owners from adopting
or enforcing a provision of the condominium’s governing document that regulates parking, noise,
odors, nuisance, use of common elements or activities that impact the cost of insurance policies held
by the condominium, provided the provision:
(a) Is reasonable; and
(b) Does not have the effect of prohibiting or restricting the use of a unit as the premises of an
exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500 or as
a certified or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(5)(a) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to condominiums that provide housing for
older persons.
(b) As used in this subsection, “housing for older persons” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 659A.421.
(6) A provision in a condominium’s governing document that restricts or prohibits the installa-
tion or use of a portable cooling device, as defined in ORS 90.355 (1), is void and unenforceable,
unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law;
(B) Violate the device manufacturer’s written safety guidelines for the device;
(C) Interfere with the common elements of the condominium; or
(D) Require amperage to power the device that cannot be accommodated by the power service
to the building, unit or circuit;
(b) The device would be installed in a window and:
(A) The window is a necessary egress from the unit;
(B) The device would interfere with the unit owner’s ability to lock a window that is accessible
from outside;
(C) Requires the use of brackets or other hardware that would damage or void the warranty of
the window or frame, puncture the envelope of the building or otherwise cause significant damages;
(D) The restrictions require that the device be adequately drained to prevent damage to the
[dwelling] unit or building; or
(E) The restrictions require that the device be installed in a manner that prevents risk of falling;
or
(c) The restrictions are only to require that the device be:
(A) Installed by building maintenance or a licensed contractor; or
(B) Removed from October 1 through April 30.
(7) A provision in a condominium’s governing document that restricts or prohibits the
installation or use of a portable solar photovoltaic energy device, as defined in section 2 of
this 2026 Act, is void and unenforceable, unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law;
(B) Violate the device manufacturer’s written safety guidelines for the device;
(C) Interfere with the common elements of the condominium; or
(D) Require an electrical capacity or amperage that cannot be accommodated by the
[5]

HB 4080
electrical service of the building, unit or circuit; or
(b) If the device would be installed in an exterior area:
(A) The exterior area is a required egress;
(B) The device would interfere with the unit owner’s ability to secure a door or window
that is accessible from outside;
(C) Installation of the device requires the use of brackets or other hardware that would
damage or void the warranty of the door or window or frame, puncture the envelope of the
building or otherwise cause significant damages; or
(D) The restrictions require that the device be installed in a manner that prevents risk
of falling.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 4 of this 2026 Act applies to tenancies commenced before, on or
after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 94.779 by section 5 of this 2026 Act apply to provisions in
governing documents adopted before, on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 100.023 by section 6 of this 2026 Act apply to provisions in
a condominium’s governing document adopted before, on or after the effective date of this
2026 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) As used in this section, “portable solar photovoltaic energy device” and
“device” mean a device that:
(a) Is moveable;
(b) Has a primary purpose of collecting solar energy and generating electricity by
photovoltaic effect;
(c) Has a maximum generating capacity of 1,200 watts or less;
(d) Is designed to be connected to a building’s electrical system through a standard
120-volt alternating current electrical outlet and receptacle;
(e) Includes a safety feature or operates with an ancillary device that prevents the
portable solar photovoltaic energy device from energizing the building’s electrical system
during a power outage; and
(f) Is listed by Underwriters Laboratories or any other nationally recognized testing lab-
oratory or an equivalent organization.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may amend the
state building code as necessary to address the installation or use of portable solar
photovoltaic energy devices to include provisions for electrical service capacity, mounting
of the device on a building exterior or the safe operations of the device.
SECTION 9. (1) Sections 2, 4 and 7 of this 2026 Act and the amendments to ORS 94.779
and 100.023 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Public Utility Commission may adopt rules and take any other action before the
operative date of specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the
commission to undertake and exercise, on or after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by
section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2026 Act takes effect July 1, 2026.

[6]